Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-4] User direction for disclosure of
digital assets. (a) A user may use an online tool to direct the custodian
to disclose to a designated recipient or not to disclose some or all of the
user's digital assets, including the content of electronic communications. If
the online tool allows the user to modify or delete a direction at all times, a
direction regarding disclosure using an online tool overrides a contrary
direction by the user in a will, trust, power of attorney, or other record.

(b) If a user has not used an online tool to
give direction under subsection (a) or if the custodian has not provided an
online tool, the user may allow or prohibit in a will, trust, power of
attorney, or other record, disclosure to a fiduciary of some or all of the
user's digital assets, including the content of electronic communications sent
or received by the user.

(c) A user's direction under subsection (a) or
(b) overrides a contrary provision in a terms-of-service agreement that does
not require the user to act affirmatively and distinctly from the user's assent
to the terms of service. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next